Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,161
Nail technology home services; inspections.

Agents of the department may make operation inspections in the homes of clients if such inspections are limited to the activities, procedures, and materials of the licensee providing nail technology home services.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 81;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,232;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 423.